Utah statutes.
19-1-503.   Requirements for engine coolant sold in state.

On or after January 1, 2011, a person may not sell engine coolant to a person in this state that is manufactured on or after January 1, 2011, if the engine coolant:

(1)  contains more than 10% ethylene glycol; and

(2)  does not contain:

(a)  denatonium benzoate within the following amounts:

(i)  a minimum of 30 parts per million; and

(ii)  a maximum of 50 parts per million; or

(b)  a similar bittering agent that renders the engine coolant unpalatable if it meets or exceeds the degree of aversion as compared to denatonium benzoate at a concentration of 30 parts per million.

